Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 14. Office of Human Resources

§ 451.
Redesignated. 2019, No 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 461.
Creation and purpose.

The Office of Human Resources is created as a permanent agency to service the members and employees of the General Assembly with nonpartisan human resources services.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 462.
Director; employees.

The Joint Legislative Management Committee shall employ an individual with experience and expertise in human resources management to be the Director of Human Resources. The Committee may conduct the hiring process itself or may delegate this duty to a special hiring committee comprising an equal number of members from the House and Senate, not all of whom shall be from the same political party; however, the Joint Legislative Management Committee shall make the final hiring decision.

The Director of Human Resources shall employ human resources and other professional staff as needed to carry out the duties of the Office of Human Resources, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee.
(b) (1) The Director of Human Resources shall employ human resources and other professional staff as needed to carry out the duties of the Office of Human Resources, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

All individuals employed by the Office of Human Resources shall be subject to the personnel policies adopted by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

The provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 (classification of State personnel) shall not apply to employees of the Office of Human Resources.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 463.
Functions.

The Office of Human Resources shall provide human resources services to members of the General Assembly and legislative employees, including:

developing, in consultation with the heads of the other legislative offices, compensation and benefits plans and personnel policies for legislative offices and employees for Joint Legislative Management Committee approval and providing advice, guidance, and technical assistance in the administration of these plans and policies;

providing training on topics such as the prevention of harassment and discrimination, implicit bias, time management, and other workplace issues;

providing job recruitment services to other legislative offices;

providing performance evaluation services to other legislative offices;

providing advice and guidance to legislative employees, supervisors, and members of the General Assembly regarding labor and employment laws, policies, and practices;

coordinating legislative internship opportunities, including registering legislative interns and developing and implementing internship policies and procedures;

developing processes for investigating and resolving disputes and other interpersonal issues involving members of the General Assembly or legislative employees, or both;

investigating and resolving, and providing guidance and assistance with investigating and resolving, employee disputes and other personnel matters; and

providing guidance and assistance with investigating and resolving conflicts involving members of the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 464.
Budget.

The Director of Human Resources shall propose a budget for the Office of Human Resources to the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 465.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

For the purposes of carrying out its duties, the Office of Human Resources shall have access to and the right to copy any public record of all executive, administrative, and judicial departments of the State, except income and franchise tax returns and other documents classified as confidential by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.